Hawaii statutes.
[§261‑4.5] Biosecurity, inspection, and cargo support facilities. The department shall coordinate with the department of
agriculture to facilitate the inspection, consolidation, deconsolidation, and
treatment of imported and exported agriculture and other inspected commodities
to meet the needs of each island and to facilitate the safe movement of
enplaned and deplaned air cargo through the airports. [L 2011, c 202,
§2]

Revision Note

Subsection designation deleted pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next